Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Part 2

Department of Transportation

42-2-201. Administration of chapter.

The department is vested with the powers, duties and functions necessary to administer this chapter.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; 1969, ch. 82, § 2; 1970, ch. 554, § 1; 1972, ch. 829, § 16; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(3); impl. am. Acts 1977, ch. 137, § 10; T.C.A., § 42-204; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 14; T.C.A., §42-2-103.

Cross-References. Airport and aircraft security, §39-17-109.

Airport, annexation-free zone, §6-58-116.

Airport noise mitigation programs, §7-3-313.

Airport noise mitigation programs, §13-20-217.

Annexation of regional airport commission property, §6-51-117.

Government tort liability, title 29, ch. 20.

Loans for airports, title 4, ch. 31, part 6.

Municipal powers, title 6, ch. 54.

Tennessee insurance guaranty associations bonds, title 4, ch. 31, part 8.

42-2-202. Office and expenses of department.

Suitable offices and office equipment shall be provided by the state for the department in Davidson County, and the department, with the approval of the commissioner, or a person delegated by the commissioner to act in the commissioner's stead, has the power to make such other expenditures as are necessary to effect the purposes of this chapter, and may incur the necessary expense for office furniture, stationery, printing, incidental expenses, and other expenses necessary for the administration of this chapter.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-206, 42-2-105.

42-2-203. Municipal airports.

Technical Services of the Department. The department may, insofar as it is reasonably possible, make available the engineering and other technical services of the department, with or without charge, to any municipality, whether acting alone or with any other municipality or with the state, or person desiring them, in connection with the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance or operation of airports, air navigation facilities, avigation easements or the acquisition, lighting, marking, or elimination of airport hazards.

State Financial Assistance. The department may render financial assistance by grant or loan or both to any municipality or municipalities acting jointly, whether acting alone or with any other municipality or with the state, in the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of an airport owned or controlled, or to be owned or controlled by such municipality or municipalities, out of appropriations made by the general assembly for such purposes. This financial assistance may be furnished in connection with federal or other financial aid for the same purposes.

Federal Aid; Other Available Funds; Technical Design Coordination with Department.

The department may act as agent for any individual municipality or municipalities acting jointly, in accepting, receiving, receipting for and disbursing federal moneys, and other moneys, public or private, made available to finance, in whole or in part, the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, equipment or operation of a municipal airport, air navigation facility, avigation easement, or the acquisition, elimination, obstruction marking or obstruction lighting of airport hazards, and if requested by an individual municipality or municipalities acting jointly, may act as its or their agent in contracting for and supervising any planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, equipment, operation, or elimination; and all municipalities are authorized to designate the department as their agent for the foregoing purposes. The department, as principal on behalf of the state, and any municipality on its own behalf, may enter into any contracts, with each other or with the United States or with any person, that may be required in connection with a grant or loan of federal moneys for municipal airport, air navigation facility, avigation easement, or airport hazard purposes. All federal moneys accepted under this section shall then be transferred or expended by the department upon the terms and conditions prescribed by the United States. All moneys received by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury, and, unless otherwise prescribed by the authority from which the moneys are received, shall be kept in separate funds designated according to the purposes for which the moneys were made available, subject to disbursement by order of the department for such purposes.

Any proposed construction activity that would involve any source of funding other than the department shall be subject to technical design coordination with the department and the receipt of its approval to ensure consistency with the state's airport system plan, unless such proposal would involve facilities for the use of the airlines or the military.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 6; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; 1977, ch. 137, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 42-213, 42-2-112.

42-2-204. State airports.

Establishment; Operation; Maintenance.

The department is authorized on behalf of and in the name of the state, out of appropriations and other moneys made available for these purposes, to plan, establish, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, regulate, protect and police airports and air navigation facilities, either within or without the state, including the construction, installation, equipment, maintenance and operation at airports or buildings and other facilities for the servicing of aircraft or for the comfort and accommodation of air travelers.

For purposes of subdivision (a)(1), the department may, by purchase, gift, devise, lease, condemnation or otherwise, acquire property, real or personal, or any interest in property, real or personal, including avigation easements and easements in airport hazards, or land outside the boundaries of an airport or airport site, as are necessary to permit safe and efficient operation of the airports or to permit the removal, elimination, obstruction-marking or obstruction-lighting of airport hazards, or to prevent the establishment of airport hazards.

In like manner, the department may acquire existing airports and air navigation facilities; provided, that it shall not acquire or take over any airport, air navigation facility, avigation easement or easement in airport hazards owned or controlled by a municipality of this or any other state without the consent of the municipality.

The department may, by sale, lease, or otherwise, dispose of any property, airport, air navigation facility, avigation easement, easement in airport hazard or portion thereof or interest therein.

Disposal shall be in accordance with the laws of this state governing the disposition of other property of the state, except that in the case of disposals to any municipality or state government or the United States for aeronautical purposes incident thereto, the sale, lease, or other disposal may be effected by the manner and upon the terms that the department may deem in the best interest of the state.

Airport Zoning. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to limit any right, power or authority of the state or a municipality to regulate airport hazards by zoning.

Joint Operations. The department may exercise any powers granted by this section jointly with any municipalities or agencies of the state government, with other states or their municipalities, or with the United States.

Condemnation.

In the condemnation of property authorized by this section, the department shall proceed in the name of the state in the manner provided by title 29, chapter 16.

For the purpose of making surveys and examinations relative to any condemnation proceedings, it shall be lawful to enter upon any land, doing no unnecessary damage.

Notwithstanding any other statute, or the charter of any municipality, the department may take possession of any property to be condemned at any time after the commencement of the condemnation proceedings.

The department shall not be precluded from abandoning the condemnation of any property in any case where possession thereof has not been taken, even after a trial jury in circuit court has rendered a verdict as to damages for the property taken by the proceedings and at any time prior to the entry of a final decree disposing of the entire eminent domain proceedings.

Federal Aid. The department is authorized to accept, receive, receipt for, disburse and expend federal money, and other moneys, public or private, made available to accomplish, in whole or in part, any of the purposes of this section. All moneys accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the department upon the terms and conditions prescribed by the United States. In accepting federal moneys under this section, the department shall have the same authority to enter into contracts on behalf of the state as is granted to the department under § 42-2-203(c) with respect to federal moneys accepted on behalf of municipalities. All moneys received by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the state treasury, and, unless otherwise prescribed by the authority from which such moneys were received, shall be kept in separate funds designated according to the purposes for which the moneys were made available, and held by the state in trust for those purposes subject to disbursement by order of the department for those purposes. All such moneys are appropriated for the purpose of which the moneys were made available, to be disbursed or expended in accordance with the terms and conditions upon which they were made available.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 7; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-214, 42-2-113.

42-2-205. Operation and use of state airports and facilities.

Departmental Operation.

In operating an airport, air navigation facility, or avigation easement owned or controlled by the state, the department may enter into contracts, leases and other arrangements for a term not exceeding fifty (50) years with any persons:

Granting the privilege of using or improving the airports or air navigation facility or any portion or facility of the airports or air navigation facility or space in the airports or air navigation facility for commercial purposes;

Conferring the privilege of supplying goods, commodities, things, services, or facilities at such airport or air navigation facility; or

Making available services to be furnished by the department or its agents at such airport or air navigation facility.

In each case, the department may establish the terms and conditions and fix the charges, rentals or fees for the privileges or services, which shall be reasonable and uniform for the same class of privilege or service and shall be established with the due regard to the property and improvements used and the expenses of operation to the state; provided, that in no case shall the public be deprived of its rightful, equal and uniform use of the airport, air navigation facility, avigation easement or portion or facility of the airport or avigation easement.

Other Operation. The department may by contract, lease or other arrangement, upon a consideration fixed by it, grant to any qualified person for a term not to exceed fifty (50) years the privilege of operating, as agent of the state or otherwise, any airport owned or controlled by the state; provided, that no person shall be granted any authority to operate the airport other than as a public airport or to enter into any contracts, leases, or other arrangements in connection with the operation of the airport that the department might not have undertaken under subsection (a).

Liens. To enforce the payment of any charges for repairs to, or improvements, or storage or care of, any personal property made or furnished by the department or its agents in connection with the operation of an airport or air navigation facility owned or operated by the state, the state shall have liens on the property, which shall be enforceable by the department as provided by law.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 7; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-215, 42-2-114.

42-2-206. State airways.

The department may designate, design, and establish, expand, or modify a state airways system that will best serve the interest of the state.

It may chart such airways system and arrange for publication and distribution of such maps, charts, notices and bulletins relating to airways that may be required in the public interest.

The system shall be supplementary to and coordinated in design and operation with the federal airways system.

The system may include all types of air navigation facilities, whether publicly or privately owned, if such facilities conform to federal safety standards.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 8; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-216, 42-2-115.

42-2-207. Contracts by department of transportation.

All contracts made by the department either as agent for the state, any municipality, or any airport authority shall be made pursuant to the laws of the state governing the making of like contracts; provided, that where the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, or operation of any airport, air navigation facility, avigation easement or the acquisition, lighting, marking or elimination of any airport hazard is financed wholly or partially with federal moneys, the department, as agent of the state, of any municipality, or of any airport authority, may let contracts in the manner prescribed by the federal authorities acting under the laws of the United States and any rules or regulations made thereunder.

Acts 1977, ch. 137, § 6; T.C.A., § 42-217; Acts 1981, ch. 264, §§ 16, 17; T.C.A., §42-2-116.

42-2-208. Exclusive rights not to be granted — Effect of section.

The department shall not grant any exclusive right for the use of any airway, airport, or air navigation facility under its jurisdiction. This section shall not be construed to prevent the making of contracts, leases and other arrangements pursuant to §§42-2-204 and42-2-205.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 10; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-218, 42-2-117.

42-2-209. Rules, regulations and standards of department.

Power to Issue.

The department may perform acts, issue and amend orders and make, promulgate, and amend reasonable, general or special rules, regulations and procedures, and establish minimum standards, consistent with this chapter, that it deems necessary to carry out this chapter and to perform its duties under this chapter, commensurate with and for the purpose of protecting and ensuring the general public interest and safety, the safety of persons operating, using or traveling in aircraft or persons receiving instructions in flying or ground subjects pertaining to aeronautics, and the safety of persons and property on land or water, and developing and promoting aeronautics in this state.

No rule or regulation of the department shall apply to airports or air navigation facilities owned or operated by the United States.

Conformity to Federal Legislation and Rules. All rules and regulations prescribed by the department under the authority of this chapter shall be kept in conformity, as nearly as may be, with the then current federal legislation governing aeronautics and the rules, regulations, and standards duly issued under that legislation.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 12; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-220, 42-2-119.

42-2-210. Licensing of air schools and aeronautics instructors.

Regulations; Issuance of Licenses; Fees. The department is authorized to provide for the licensing of air schools, and of aeronautics instructors giving instructions in ground subjects pertaining to aeronautics. For each license of an air school, it may charge a fee not exceeding fifteen dollars ($15.00), and for each license of an aeronautics instructor in ground subjects pertaining to aeronautics, it may charge a fee not exceeding ten dollars ($10.00), except that the fee for the license of an aeronautics instructor shall not be charged in addition to the fee for the license of an air school in the event there is only one (1) aeronautics instructor instructing at that air school and that instructor is the operator of the air school. Any person licensed under this section must be then currently licensed as an instructor-pilot by the civil aeronautics authority of the United States.

Refusal to Issue Suspension or Revocation. The department may refuse to issue or may suspend or revoke, temporarily or permanently, any license of an air school or aeronautics instructor required pursuant to this section if it reasonably determines upon notice and opportunity for hearing that such air school or aeronautics instructor is not qualified. In arriving at such determination, the department shall be governed by the standards prescribed in § 42-2-209, and shall consider, among other things, whether the school or instructor has violated any statute of this state or the United States relating to aeronautics or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to those statutes, or whether the aeronautics instructor or any aeronautics instructor of the air school is addicted to the use of narcotics or other habit-forming drugs or to the excessive use of intoxicating liquor, or has made any false statements of a material nature in connection with an application to the department under this chapter, or has been guilty of conduct dangerous to the public safety or the safety of those engaged in aeronautics.

Unlawful Operation. It is unlawful for a person to operate an air school or for any aeronautics instructor to give instructions in ground subjects pertaining to aeronautics without an appropriate license as may be duly required by rule or regulation promulgated under subsection (a). It is unlawful for any aeronautics instructor to give instruction in flying unless the instructor has an appropriate effective instructor's rating, certificate, permit or license as a flight instructor issued by the United States.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 14; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-222, 42-2-121.

42-2-211. Licensing of airports.

Site Approvals; Regulations; Issuance of Certificates; No Fees; Standards; Effective Period; Revocation; Existing Airports.

Except as provided in subsection (d), the department is authorized to provide for the approval of airport sites and the issuance of certificates of approvals. No charge shall be made for any approval, and certificates of approval shall be issued without charge to all persons requesting them. Upon the promulgation of a rule or regulation providing for approvals, any municipality or person desiring or planning to construct or establish an airport may, prior to the acquisition of the site or prior to the construction or establishment of the proposed airport, make application to the department for approval of the site. The department shall with reasonable dispatch grant approval of a site if it is satisfied that:

The site is adequate for the proposed airport;

The proposed airport, if constructed or established, will conform to minimum standards of safety; and

Safe air traffic patterns could be worked out for the proposed airport and for all existing airports and approved airport sites in its vicinity.

An approval of a site may be granted subject to any reasonable conditions that the department may deem necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section, and shall remain in effect, unless sooner revoked by the department, until a license for an airport located on the approved site has been issued pursuant to subsection (b). The department may, after notice and opportunity for hearing to holders of certificates of an approval, revoke an approval if it reasonably determines that:

There has been an abandonment of the site as an airport site;

There has been a failure within the time prescribed, or if no time was prescribed, within a reasonable time, to develop the site as an airport or to comply with the conditions of the approval; or

Because of change of physical or legal conditions or circumstances the site is no longer usable for the aeronautical purposes for which the approval was granted.

No approval or certificate shall be required for the site of any existing airport; provided, that all applications for licenses to construct airports in counties having a population in excess of one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1950 federal census, have been previously approved by all municipal agencies, located in the counties, controlling or regulating airports located in the county.

Licenses; Regulations; Issuance; Renewals; Fees; Standards; Revocation; Unlawful Operation. Except as provided in subsection (d), the department is authorized to provide for the licensing of airports and the annual renewal of licenses. It may charge license fees not exceeding twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each original license, and not exceeding ten dollars ($10.00) for each renewal of a license. Upon the promulgation of a rule or regulation providing for licensing, the department shall with reasonable dispatch, upon receipt of an application for an original license and the payment of the duly required fee for the license, issue an appropriate license if it is satisfied that the airport conforms to minimum standards of safety, and that safe air traffic patterns can be worked out for the airport and for all existing airport and approved airport sites in its vicinity. All licenses shall be renewable annually upon payment of the fees prescribed. Licenses and renewals thereof may be issued subject to any reasonable conditions that the department may deem necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section. The department may, after notice and opportunity for hearing to the licensee, revoke any license or renewal thereof, or refuse to issue a renewal, if it reasonably determines that:

There has been an abandonment of the airport as such;

There has been a failure to comply with the conditions of the license or renewal thereof; or

Because of change of physical or legal conditions or circumstances the airport has become either unsafe or unusable for the aeronautical purposes for which the license or renewal was issued. Except as provided in subsection (d), it is unlawful for any municipality, or officer, or employee thereof, or any person to operate an airport without an appropriate license for the airport, as may be duly required by rule or regulation issued pursuant to this subsection (b).

Optional Public Hearings. In connection with the grant of approval of a proposed airport site or the issuance of an airport license under subsections (a) and (b), the department may, on its own motion or upon the request of an affected or interested person, hold a hearing open to the public as provided in § 42-2-212.

Exemptions. This section does not apply to airports owned or operated by the United States. The department may, from time to time, to the extent necessary, exempt any other class of airports, pursuant to a reasonable classification or grouping, from any rule or regulation promulgated under this section or from any requirement of such a rule or regulation, if it finds that the application of the rule, regulation or requirement would be an undue burden on such class and is not required in the interest of public safety.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 15; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-223, 42-2-122.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cited: Riggs v. Burson, 941 S.W.2d 44, 1997 Tenn. LEXIS 126 (Tenn. 1997).

42-2-212. Investigations — Hearings.

General Power of Department; Accidents; Witnesses; Subpoenas; Court Order. The department, or any person designated by the department, has the power to hold investigations, inquiries and hearings concerning matters covered by this chapter and the rules, regulations, and orders of the department, and concerning accidents in aeronautics within this state. Hearings shall be open to the public, and except as provided in § 42-2-216, shall be held upon such call or notice as the department may deem advisable. The department, and every person designated by the department to hold any inquiry, investigation or hearing, has the power to administer oaths and affirmations, certify to all official acts, issue subpoenas, and order the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of papers, books and documents. In case of the failure of any person to comply with any subpoena or order issued under the authority of this section, the department or its authorized representative may invoke the aid of any court of general jurisdiction of this state. The court may thereupon order that person to comply with the requirements of the subpoena or order or to give evidence touching the matter in question. Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as contempt of court.

Use and Limitations on Reports of Investigations. In order to facilitate the making of investigations by the department in the interest of public safety and promotion of aeronautics the public interest requires, and it is therefore provided, that the reports of investigations or hearings, or any part of the reports, shall not be admitted in evidence or used for any purpose in any suit, action or proceeding growing out of any matter referred to in the investigation, hearing or report, except in case of any suit, action or proceeding, civil or criminal, instituted by or in behalf of the department in the name of the state under this chapter or other laws of the state relating to aeronautics; nor shall the department, or the commissioner, or any agent or employee of the department, be required to testify to any facts ascertained in, or information gained by reason of, its official capacity, or be required to testify as an expert witness in any suit, action or proceeding involving any aircraft. Subject to this subsection (b), the department may in its discretion make available to appropriate federal, state and municipal agencies information and material developed in the course of its investigations and hearings.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 16; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-224, 42-2-123.

42-2-213. Federal-state joint hearings — Reciprocal services — Accident reporting.

The department is authorized to confer with or to hold joint hearings with any agency of the United States in connection with any matter arising under this chapter, or relating to the sound development of aeronautics.

The department is authorized to avail itself of the cooperation, services, records and facilities of the agencies of the United States as fully as may be practicable in the administration and enforcement of this chapter. The department shall furnish to the agencies of the United States its cooperation, services, records and facilities, insofar as may be practicable.

The department shall report to the appropriate agency of the United States all accidents in aeronautics in this state of which it is informed, and shall insofar as is practicable preserve, protect and prevent the removal of the component parts of any aircraft involved in an accident being investigated by it until the federal agency institutes an investigation.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 17; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-225, 42-2-124.

42-2-214. Use of state and municipal facilities and services.

In carrying out this chapter, the department may use the facilities and services of other agencies of the state and of the municipalities of the state to the utmost extent possible, and agencies and municipalities are authorized and directed to make available their facilities and services.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 18; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-226, 42-2-125.

42-2-215. Enforcement of aeronautics laws.

It is the duty of the department, the commissioner and employees of the department, and every state and municipal officer charged with the enforcement of state and municipal laws, to enforce and assist in the enforcement of this chapter and of all rules, regulations and orders issued pursuant to this chapter and of all other laws of this state relating to aeronautics; and in that connection each of the persons mentioned in this section is authorized to inspect and examine at reasonable hours any premises, and the buildings and other structures on the premises, where airports, air navigation facilities, air schools, or other aeronautical activities are operated or conducted. In aid of the enforcement of this chapter, the rules, regulations and orders issued pursuant to this chapter and of all other laws of the state relative to aeronautics, general police powers are conferred upon the department, the commissioner, and employees of the department designated by the department to exercise those powers.

The department is authorized, in the name of the state, to enforce this chapter and the rules, resolutions and orders issued pursuant to this chapter by injunction or other legal process in the courts of this state.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 19; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-227, 42-2-126.

42-2-216. Orders — Notice and opportunity for hearings — Judicial review.

Every order of the department requiring performance of certain acts or compliance with certain requirements and any denial or revocation of any approval, certificate or license shall set forth the reasons and shall state the acts to be done or requirements to be met before approval by the department will be given or the approval, license or certificate granted or restored, or the order modified or changed. Orders issued by the department pursuant to this chapter shall be served upon the persons affected either by registered mail or in person. In every case where notice and opportunity for hearing are required under this chapter, except by agreement of the parties, the order of the department shall, on not less than ten (10) days' notice, specify a time when and place where the person affected may be heard, or the time within which the person may request a hearing, and the order shall become effective upon the expiration of the time for exercising the opportunity for hearing, unless a hearing is held or requested within the time provided, in which case the order shall be suspended until the department affirms, disaffirms or modifies such order after hearing held or default by the person affected. To the extent practicable, a hearing on the order shall be held in the county where the affected person resides or does business. Any person aggrieved by an order of the department or by the grant, denial, or revocation of any approval, license or certificate may have the action of the department reviewed by the courts of this state in the manner provided for, and subject to the rules of law applicable to, the review of the orders of other administrative bodies of the state, as set forth in title 27, chapter 9.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 20; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-228, 42-2-127.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

42-2-217. Exchange of violations information.

The department is authorized to report to the appropriate federal agencies and agencies of other states all proceedings instituted charging violation of §§42-1-201,42-1-202 and42-2-104 and all penalties, of which it has knowledge, imposed upon pilots or the owners or operators of aircraft for violations of the law of this state relating to aeronautics or for violations of the rules, regulations or orders of the department. The department is authorized to receive reports of penalties and other data from agencies of the federal government and other states and, when necessary, to enter into agreements with federal agencies and the agencies of other states governing the delivery, receipt, exchange and use of reports and data. The department may make the reports and data of the federal agencies, the agencies of other states, and the courts of the state available, with or without request for the reports and data, to any and all courts of this state, and to any officer of the state or of a municipality authorized pursuant to §42-2-215 to enforce the aeronautics laws.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 24; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-230, 42-2-129.

42-2-218. Funds expendable for promotion of aeronautics.

The department is authorized to spend funds that may be available for the purpose of furthering aeronautics generally in the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 25; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-231, 42-2-130.

42-2-219. Certificates of public convenience and necessity — Granting — Fees.

The department has the exclusive jurisdiction of granting certificates of public convenience and necessity for the operation of common carriers by air for the transportation of persons or property. Upon the filing of an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity, the department shall, within a reasonable time, fix a time and place for hearing the application, not less than twenty (20) days after the filing, and shall hear and determine the application within a reasonable length of time. If the department finds that the proposed operation is justified, and that the applicant is fit, willing and able to properly perform the services proposed and to conform to this chapter and the requirements, rules and regulations of the department, it shall issue a certificate to the applicant, subject to the terms, limitations and restrictions the department may deem proper, authorizing in whole or in part the operation covered by the application. If the department finds that the proposed operation is not justified, the application shall be denied. At the time an application is filed, the department shall require the payment of an application fee, which shall be set by the department at an amount sufficient to defray the usual costs of a hearing. Nothing in this section in any way applies to an air carrier operating by authority of a certificate, or certificates, of public convenience and necessity issued by the civil aeronautics authority, the civil aeronautics board, or any other federal agency authorized to issue such certificates.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 26; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-232, 42-2-131.

42-2-220. Cooperation with federal agencies.

The department is empowered to work in connection with the Tennessee valley authority, or any department or agency of the federal government, for the purpose of rendering service or advancing aeronautics generally in the state, and to spend such available funds as are necessary to carry out the work.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 27; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-233, 42-2-132.

42-2-221. Air schools — Establishment and maintenance.

The department is empowered to establish and maintain or aid in the establishment and maintenance of air schools offering instructions in aeronautics, either in flying or ground subjects or both, for the purpose of fostering aeronautics in Tennessee.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 28; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-234, 42-2-133.

42-2-222. Audits of municipalities receiving state aid — Withholding aid where funds improperly used.

The department is charged with the express duty of auditing the books of any municipality or airport authority of this state that receives any of the funds appropriated or allocated by the state of Tennessee, insofar as may be necessary to determine that the funds are used solely and exclusively for the purpose of advancing the aviation program in the state and for no other purpose. In the event any municipality refuses the department or its representatives the right to make an audit, or in the event any such municipality or airport authority has misused the funds, then the department is empowered to and shall direct the withholding of any further distribution of state funds to the municipality or airport authority until it has reimbursed and restored to its aeronautics fund the amount so misused. The state treasurer, the commissioner of finance and administration and the commissioner of revenue shall respect and be governed by any withholding orders issued by the department under this section.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 29; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, §§ 3, 14; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; 1977, ch. 137, § 8; T.C.A., §§ 42-235, 42-2-134.

Cross-References. Municipal Airport Act, aid to municipalities, §42-5-119.

42-2-223. Department as agent for municipalities and airport authorities in receiving certain federal funds — Exceptions.

The department shall act as agent for each municipality and airport authority for the purposes of applying for, receiving and disbursing federal funds made available pursuant to the former Airport and Airway Development Act of 1970, 84 Stat. 219, 49 U.S.C. 1970 ed. § 1701 et seq. [repealed], or any amendment thereto, unless a municipality or an airport authority owns an airport having a minimum of twenty-five thousand (25,000) originating enplanements annually on regularly scheduled airline carriers as certified by the federal civil aeronautics board, in which event the municipality or airport authority may act as principal with respect to any airport owned by it, or it may designate the department as its agent for the purposes mentioned in this subsection (a).

All funds received by the department shall be deposited in the state treasury to be kept and disbursed in a manner consistent with federal requirements.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 30; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; 1977, ch. 137, § 9; T.C.A., §§ 42-236, 42-2-135.

Compiler's Notes. The Airport and Airway Development Act of 1970, 84 Stat. 219, 49 U.S.C. 1970 ed. § 1701 et seq., referred to in this section, was repealed in 1982.

Cross-References. Airport authorities, federal and state aid, department as agent, §42-3-114.

Department of transportation as agent for municipalities in receiving certain federal funds, §42-5-119.

42-2-224. Procedure, rules and regulations governing department — Statutes governing procedure before Tennessee public utility commission applicable.

Sections 4-5-322, 4-5-323, 65-2-101 — 65-2-109, and 65-2-112 — 65-2-121 shall also apply to the department of transportation and all procedures and proceedings of such department for the purposes of all matters within the jurisdiction of the department.

“Commission,” as used in the sections referred to in subsection (a), means the department of transportation.

Acts 1957, ch. 374, § 32; 1972, ch. 829, § 21; T.C.A., §§ 42-238, 42-2-137; 2017.

Compiler's Notes. This section is set out in the supplement in order to update the section heading by substituting “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in light of Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 82.